Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 4 ROADSIDE ADVERTISING
43-1-414. Removal of nonconforming devices.

The department may remove any nonconforming advertising device and may acquire all real and personal property rights pertaining to the nonconforming advertising device by gift, purchase, agreement, exchange, or eminent domain. All proceedings in eminent domain shall be conducted as may be provided by law. The department may adopt appraisal concepts and acquisition procedures which are appropriate to the evaluation and removal of nonconforming advertising devices.

Just compensation shall be paid for each lawfully permitted nonconforming advertising device. Where the nonconforming advertising device has been modified with approval of the department, just compensation shall be determined as if no changes had been made, unless the changes shall have resulted in a decrease in value. Just compensation shall be paid for the taking, from the owner of such advertising device, of all right, title, leasehold, and interest in such advertising device and for the taking from the owner of real property on which such advertising device is located and of the right to maintain such advertising device.

No advertising device shall be required to be removed until the federal share of the compensation required to be paid upon acquisition of such device becomes available to the state. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to prevent the department from acquiring any advertising device when the federal share of the compensation required to be paid for such device becomes available to the state, and no state funds shall be used to pay just compensation for any advertising device located along a secondary highway in this state until the federal share of such compensation becomes available to the state.

The department shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations governing acquisition procedures for the advertising devices, appraisal of advertising devices, and the administration and enforcement of this section. Rules for the appraisal of advertising devices shall take into account normal depreciation.

Tourist-related advertising devices which comply with the rules and regulations adopted by the department may be exempted from removal under the following conditions:

Upon receipt of a declaration, resolution, certified copy of an ordinance, or other clear direction from a state agency, board of county commissioners, city and county, municipality, or other governmental agency, which includes or has attached, on forms provided by the department, an analysis of negative economic impacts provided by such entity and which follows the criteria and method of economic analysis established by the department that removal of tourist-related advertising devices in a defined area would work a substantial economic hardship on that defined area, the department shall review the entity's economic analysis and such defined area. If the department finds that the entity has used the method of economic analysis as prescribed and the entity has determined that the defined area would suffer substantial economic hardship by such removal and that the declaration complies with all applicable rules and regulations, the department shall forward such declaration, resolution, or document and economic analysis with its recommendations to the United States secretary of transportation pursuant to 23 U.S.C. sec. 131(o). Any such declaration, resolution, or document submitted to the department shall further find that such tourist-related advertising devices provide directional information about goods and services in the interest of the traveling public and request the retention by the state in such defined areas of such tourist-related advertising devices.

Each exempted tourist-related advertising device must comply with requirements of the department concerning the directional contents of the device.

The department will review and evaluate each defined area at least every three years to determine if each exemption continues to be warranted.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to affect the application of any of the provisions of this part 4 to any advertising device until such date as the advertising device is required to be removed under this section. This section is enacted to comply with the requirements of the federal "Highway Beautification Act of 1965".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2015, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-423 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For the federal "Highway Beautification Act of 1965", see Pub.L. 89-285, codified at 23 U.S.C. § 131 et seq.

43-1-415. Administration and enforcement - authority for agreements - rules.

The department shall administer and enforce the provisions of this part 4 and shall promulgate and enforce rules and standards necessary to carry out the provisions of this part 4 including, but not limited to:

Rules necessary to qualify the state for payments made available by congress to those states that meet federal standards of roadside advertising control;

Rules relating to the maintenance of nonconforming advertising devices;

Rules to control the erection and maintenance on all state highways of advertising devices located in areas zoned for industrial or commercial uses;

Rules governing the removal and acquisition of nonconforming advertising devices;

Rules necessary to permit the exemption of tourist-related advertising devices by the secretary of transportation under 23 U.S.C. sec. 131 (o);

Rules governing specific information signs under section 43-1-420.

Nothing in this part 4 shall be construed to permit advertising devices to be erected or maintained which would disqualify the state for payments made available to those states which meet federal standards of roadside advertising control.

The department may enter into agreements with the secretary of transportation of the United States to carry out the national policy concerning outdoor advertising adjacent to the interstate system and federal-aid primary highways and to accept any allotment of funds by the United States, or any department or agency thereof, appropriated in furtherance of federal-aid highway legislation.

The rules of the department must not impose any additional requirements or more strict requirements than those imposed by this part 4.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2017, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(4) added, p. 1343, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1) and (4) amended, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2592, § 7, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-410 as it existed prior to 1981.

Cross references:

For promulgation of rules and regulations, see article 4 of title 24.

43-1-416. Local control of outdoor advertising devices.

Nothing in this part 4 shall be construed to prevent use of zoning powers and establishment of stricter limitations or controls on advertising devices by any municipality or county within its boundaries so long as such limitations or controls do not jeopardize the receipt by the state of its full share of federal highway funds.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2017, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-405 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-417. Violation and penalty.

The erection of any advertising device without a permit from the department where one is required by this part 4, or the use or maintenance of any advertising device in violation of any provision of this part 4, is declared to be illegal. In addition to other remedies provided by law, including the department's ability to seek a court order enjoining violations, the department is authorized to institute an appropriate action or proceeding to prevent or remove such violation in any district court of competent jurisdiction. The removal of any advertising device unlawfully erected, used, or maintained shall be at the expense of the person who erects and maintains such a device.

Any person who violates any provision of this part 4, upon being found liable thereof, shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for each violation, as ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction. Each day of violation of a provision of this part 4 shall constitute a separate violation. The department shall enforce the provisions of this part 4 through a civil action.

Only the department, or a person with the written approval of the department, may erect or maintain any advertising device located either wholly or partly within the right-of-way of any state highway that is a part of the state highway system, including streets within cities, cities and counties, and incorporated towns. All advertising devices so located without approval by the department are public nuisances, and any law enforcement officer or peace officer in the state of Colorado or employee of the department is authorized and directed to remove these devices without notice.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3)(a) amended, p. 278, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2592, § 8, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-406 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-418. Outdoor advertising program cost recovery center.

The department shall establish a cost recovery center within the state highway fund. Except for revenue required to be credited to the state highway fund as specified in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall deposit permit fees collected under this part 4 in the cost recovery center to carry out its duties under this part 4. The fee structure shall be reviewed by the department every four years.

The department shall expend all revenue collected pursuant to section 43-1-420 to defray the costs of administering specific information signs, business signs installed on specific information signs, and tourist-oriented directional signs and shall credit all other revenue collected pursuant to this part 4 to the state highway fund.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1188), ch. 73, p. 304, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-420 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-419. Scenic byways - Independence pass scenic area highway.

State highways designated as scenic byways by the transportation commission must have no new advertising devices erected which are visible from the highway.

Existing advertising devices along scenic byways which are in compliance with this part 4 and the rules and regulations of the department may be maintained as long as they remain in compliance with all provisions of this part 4 and the rules and regulations of the department.

An advertising device shall be considered to be visible from a designated highway if it is plainly visible to the driver of a vehicle who is proceeding in a legally designated direction and traveling at the posted speed.

As used in this paragraph (c), "visible" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 43-1-403 (17).

Independence pass on state highway 82 and sixteen miles of said highway extending on either side of Independence pass in Pitkin and Lake counties, Colorado, is designated as a scenic area highway, and no advertising devices shall be erected on or near said highway so as to be visible to motor vehicle operators on said highway.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1343, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1)(c) added, p. 1487, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2593, § 9, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-1-421 as it existed prior to 1981.

43-1-420. Specific information signs and tourist-oriented directional signs authorized - rules.

The department may erect, administer, and maintain signs within highway rights-of-way for the display of advertising and information of interest to the traveling public, pursuant to the federal authority set forth in 23 U.S.C. secs. 109 (d), 131 (f), and 315 and 49 CFR 1.48 (b).

In addition to erecting, administering, and maintaining the signs authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the department may authorize the erection, administration, and maintenance of specific information signs within highway rights-of-way upon the interstate system for the purpose of providing information pursuant to federal authority.

(1.5) As used in this section, "urbanized area" means that area within the boundary of a metropolitan area having a population of fifty thousand or more as determined by the United States bureau of the census in its latest census and as included on the urbanized area map approved by the department.

The department may issue permits for business signs to be installed on specific information signs, all such specific information signs and business signs to be constructed and installed at the expense of the business being identified unless otherwise specified by a contractor in an agreement negotiated pursuant to section 43-1-1202 (1)(a)(XI). Permits for such business signs shall be issued for a period of one year, beginning each January 1, without proration for periods less than a year. Each application for an initial permit or for a renewal of an existing permit shall be accompanied by an administration and maintenance fee to be determined by the department or by the contractor in an agreement negotiated pursuant to section 43-1-1202 (1)(a)(XI). In the event that the number of applications for permits for a particular location exceeds the number of business signs that can be accommodated at that location, the department or, if so specified in an agreement negotiated pursuant to section 43-1-1202 (1)(a)(XI), the contractor, shall develop a method for the annual rotation of such business signs. The department shall not condition eligibility for business signs on the utilization of any other off-premise outdoor advertising devices.

The department may issue permits and adopt rules for the erection, administration, and maintenance of tourist-oriented directional signs within highway rights-of-way not on the interstate system and not on freeways or expressways, as such highways are defined in the rules, that are in urbanized areas, for the display of information of interest to the traveling public pursuant to the federal authority therefor as set forth in 23 U.S.C. secs. 109 (d), 315, and 402 (a) and 49 CFR 1.48 (b) and in accordance with federal requirements. Any tourist-oriented directional sign erected pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be required to comply with all applicable regulations of the county, city and county, or municipality in which the sign is located. A county, city and county, or municipality may choose to authorize such signs within its jurisdiction by adoption of a resolution to that effect by the governing body of the county, city and county, or municipality, which resolution shall be directed to the executive director of the department or the executive director's designee. Upon receipt of the resolution, the department shall authorize further implementation of the tourist-oriented directional sign program within the affected jurisdiction subject to the rules adopted by the department. The department shall not condition eligibility for business signs on the utilization of any other off-premise outdoor advertising devices.

The department may contract with private businesses to implement all or part of the sign programs authorized by this section pursuant to the public-private initiatives program set forth in part 12 of this article.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2018, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1551, § 1, effective March 12.

L. 89:

(3) added, p. 1628, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 165, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2004:

(5) added, p. 9, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) and (3) amended, p. 287, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2012:

(1)(a) and (5) amended, (HB 12-1108), ch. 187, p. 713, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(5) repealed, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1710, § 142, effective August 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1998 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 65, Session Laws of Colorado 1998.

43-1-421. On-premise advertising device - extension authorized. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 277, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 777, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (SB 21-263), ch. 388, p. 2593, § 10, effective June 30.